Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 3-129, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3-129. A. The Secretary of the State Election Board is
authorized to publish the Roster of State and County Officials
Officers, along with election results and statistics, lists of
candidates filing for office, voter registration statistics, and
such other publications as he the Secretary deems necessary for the
discharge of his or her duties.

B. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall cause a
report to be issued electronically at least once per calendar year
with the total number of:
1. Notices sent to the chief election official of another state
providing information about a voter in that state who is registered
to vote in this state;
2. Notices sent to each state;
3. Notices received from the chief election official of another
state indicating that a voter from this state registered to vote in
that state;
4. Notices received from each state; and
5. Voter registrations canceled in this state due to a
definitive match of the information provided in such notices with
registered voters in another state.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 4-112, as
amended by Section 18, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (26 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 4-112), is amended to read as follows:
Section 4-112. A. The Secretary of the State Election Board
shall devise and distribute a registration application form to be
used for registering voters. Such registration application shall
contain the following information:
1. The applicant's full name and date of birth, county and
place of residence, and mailing address pursuant to the provisions
of subsection G of this section;
2. A space or section to designate a political party recognized
by the laws of the State of Oklahoma this state with which the
applicant chooses to be affiliated;
3. The Oklahoma driver license or identification card number if
the applicant has been issued a current and valid driver license or
identification card by Service Oklahoma, or if the applicant does
ENR. S. B. NO. 1451 Page 2

not have a valid Oklahoma driver license or identification card, the
last four digits of the voter's Social Security number;
4. An oath of the eligibility of the applicant to become a
registered voter; and
5. A space or section for the applicant to indicate whether he
or she has previously been registered to vote in another county or
state and, if so, a space or section to indicate his or her prior
registration information including his or her name, residence
address and county, and political affiliation; and
5. 6. Such other information as may be deemed necessary by the
Secretary to identify such applicant and to ascertain his or her
eligibility.
B. A voter registration application shall be signed by the
applicant in writing. The applicant shall personally subscribe his
or her name to or make his or her mark on the application, and no
agent, representative, or employee of the applicant may sign or mark
on the applicant's behalf. The signature or mark must shall be the
original, handwritten signature, autograph, or mark of the
applicant. No facsimile, reproduction, typewritten, or other
substitute signature, autograph, or mark will be valid.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Secretary of the State
Election Board shall prescribe procedures to authorize any person
incapable of personally making a mark to complete a voter
registration application with assistance of an official of any voter
registration agency or licensed operator specified in Sections 4-
109.2 and 4-109.3 of this title. Provided, for applications
submitted electronically, in lieu of the signature requirements set
forth in this subsection, the applicant shall consent to the use of
his or her driver license or identification card signature as
provided in Section 4-109.4 of this title.
C. Persons who do not indicate a recognized political party or
political organization on their registration application shall be
designated as Independents.
D. Any person may apply in writing to the Secretary of the
State Election Board for permission to print, copy, or otherwise
prepare and distribute the registration applications designed by the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1451 Page 3

Secretary of the State Election Board. The Secretary may revoke any
such permission at any time.
E. All registration applications shall be distributed to the
public at no charge.
F. The Secretary also shall prescribe procedures to accept and
use the National Mail Voter Registration Form, or its successor, as
required by the National Voter Registration Act of 1993. Provided,
to be accepted as a valid voter registration application, the form
shall include the applicant's original, handwritten signature,
autograph, or mark as described in subsection B of this section.
G. Applicants for voter registration or for change of voter
registration in any way shall provide a residence address and, if
different from the residence address, a mailing address. A
residence address shall include the street address of the residence,
including a full house number, street name or number, apartment or
suite number, if applicable, and zip code. If a street address is
not available for the residence, applicants shall provide such
information as the Secretary of the State Election Board deems
necessary for voter registration purposes. A post office box may
not be given as a residence address. A mailing address, which shall
include the city and zip code, may be the actual emergency
notification or 911 9-1-1 address on file in the local community, a
rural route and box number, a post office box number, or a street
address.
H. A full or partial Social Security number or driver license
number in a voter registration record or a voter registration
application shall not be considered a public record and shall be
kept confidential by the State Election Board and each county
election board.
I. By completing and submitting a signed voter registration
application, the application shall be deemed an applicant's request
for the cancellation of any prior voter registration in another
county or state pursuant to 52 U.S.C., Section 20507(a)(3)(A).
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 4-120.6, is
amended to read as follows:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1451 Page 4

Section 4-120.6. The secretary of each county election board
shall cancel the registration of allregistered all registered voters
who have registered in another county in Oklahoma this state, or in
another state, upon receipt of notice of same. For any registered
voter who indicated on his or her voter registration application
that he or she was previously registered to vote in another state,
the Secretary of the State Election Board shall cause a notice to be
sent to the chief election official of the state where the voter was
previously registered.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
The changes to voter registration applications required by this
act shall be effective for any such applications created or printed
on or after January 1, 2027, or earlier where practicable.
SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1451 Page 5

Passed the Senate the 14th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1451 Page 6